Vermont, session 2025-2026, H178.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. EDUCATION FUND REFUND; CITY OF BARRE TIF DISTRICT;
TAX INCREMENT; FY 2016–FY 2020
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the sum of $437,028.00 shall
be transferred from the Education Fund to the City of Barre not later than fiscal
year 2026 to compensate the City for overpayments of education property
VT LEG #380206 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.178
2025 Page 2 of 2
taxes in fiscal years 2016 through 2020 due to insufficient retention of tax
increment from the City’s Tax Increment Financing District fund.
Sec. 2. EDUCATION FUND REFUND; MILTON TOWN CORE TIF
DISTRICT; TAX INCREMENT; FY 2017–FY 2023
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the sum of $184,451.00 shall
be transferred from the Education Fund to the Town of Milton not later than
fiscal year 2026 to compensate the Town for overpayments of education
property taxes in fiscal years 2017 through 2023 due to insufficient retention of
tax increment from the Town Core’s Tax Increment Financing District fund.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380206 v.1